src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.aff
SFX B or entiumve [^ei]or 
SFX B or entibus [^ei]or 
SFX B or entibusque [^ei]or 
SFX B or entibusne [^ei]or 
SFX B or entibusve [^ei]or 
SFX B or entia [^ei]or 
SFX B or entiaque [^ei]or 
SFX B or entiane [^ei]or 
SFX B or entiave [^ei]or 
SFX B or endus [^ei]or # adjectif verbal
SFX B or endusque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endusne [^ei]or 
SFX B or endusve [^ei]or 
SFX B or ende [^ei]or 
SFX B or endeque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endene [^ei]or 
SFX B or endeve [^ei]or 
SFX B or endum [^ei]or 
SFX B or endumque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endumne [^ei]or 
SFX B or endumve [^ei]or 
SFX B or endi [^ei]or 
SFX B or endique [^ei]or 
SFX B or endine [^ei]or 
SFX B or endive [^ei]or 
SFX B or endo [^ei]or 
SFX B or endoque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endone [^ei]or 
SFX B or endove [^ei]or 
SFX B or enda [^ei]or 
SFX B or endaque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endane [^ei]or 
SFX B or endave [^ei]or 
SFX B or endam [^ei]or 
SFX B or endamque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endamne [^ei]or 
SFX B or endamve [^ei]or 
SFX B or endae [^ei]or 
SFX B or endaeque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endaene [^ei]or 
SFX B or endaeve [^ei]or 
SFX B or endos [^ei]or 
SFX B or endosque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endosne [^ei]or 
SFX B or endosve [^ei]or 
SFX B or endorum [^ei]or 
SFX B or endorumque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endorumne [^ei]or 
SFX B or endorumve [^ei]or 
SFX B or endis [^ei]or 
SFX B or endisque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endisne [^ei]or 
SFX B or endisve [^ei]or 
SFX B or endas [^ei]or 
SFX B or endasque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endasne [^ei]or 
SFX B or endasve [^ei]or 
SFX B or endarum [^ei]or 
SFX B or endarumque [^ei]or 
SFX B or endarumne [^ei]or 
SFX B or endarumve [^ei]or 
